Wisconsin, session 2025, AB577.
do enact as follows:AB577,13Section 1. 253.12 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB577,2,24253.12 (7) Funding. From the appropriation account under s. 20.435 (1) 1(gm), the department shall allocate $95,000 $500,000 annually for the birth defect 2prevention and surveillance system under this section.AB577,23Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB577,2,74(1) The authorized FTE positions for the department of health services are 5increased by 3.3 PR positions, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.435 6(1) (gm), for the purpose of maintaining the birth defect prevention and surveillance 7system under s. 253.12.AB577,38Section 3. Fiscal changes.AB577,2,129(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 10of health services under s. 20.435 (1) (gm), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 11is increased by $405,000 and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased 12by $405,000 for the birth defect prevention and surveillance system under s. 253.12.AB577,2,1313